California, session 20252026, SB1196.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 931 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:931. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a)“Accessory dwelling unit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 66313 of the Government Code.(b)(a) “Electrification” means any new, expanded, or change in use of electricity related to the policies described in Section 933, including, but not limited to, in the industrial, commercial, agricultural, housing, or transportation sectors.(c)(b) “Energization” and “energize” mean connecting customers to the electrical distribution grid and establishing adequate electrical distribution capacity or upgrading electrical distribution or transmission capacity to provide electrical service for a new customer, or to provide upgraded electrical service to an existing customer. The determination of adequate electrical distribution capacity includes consideration of future load. “Energization” and “energize” do not include activities related to connecting electrical supply resources.(d)(c) “Energization time period” means the elapsed time beginning when the electrical corporation receives a substantially complete energization project application and ending when the electric service is installed and energized.(e)“Junior accessory dwelling unit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 66313 of the Government Code.(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), “small energization project” means an energization project that does not require distribution or service line extensions or upgrades under the line extension framework adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 783 and implemented in the Electric Rule 15 tariff or Electric Rule 16 tariff, or any successor or substantially similar tariffs adopted by the commission governing distribution or service line extensions or upgrades by an electrical corporation.(2) “Small energization project” includes an energization project that does not require distribution or service line extensions and whose only upgrade is a new electric meter required by an electric corporation or local jurisdiction.SEC. 2. Section 934.5 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:934.5. (a) The commission, in a new or existing proceeding, shall, by September 30, 2027, establish timelines for electrical corporations to respond to and process requests to energize an accessory dwelling unit and junior accessory dwelling unit. small energization projects.(b) In establishing the timelines, the commission shall do all of the following:(1) Establish the times by which an application received by an electrical corporation shall be determined to be complete and by which the determination is to be provided in writing communicated to the applicant.(2) Require an electrical corporation corporation, in response to an individual application, to provide a list of deficiencies for an application determined to be incomplete and an explanation of how the applicant may remedy the deficiencies.(3) Establish the time by which an electrical corporation is required to respond to a cured notify the applicant of a complete application.(4)Establish the time by which an electrical corporation is required to provide a load assessment for an accessory dwelling unit and inform the applicant as to whether a new electrical panel or electrical meter is required to provide the electrical service connection.(5)Establish the time by which an electrical corporation is required to verify that the installation of an electrical panel is complete.(6)Establish the time by which an electrical corporation is required to complete the service connection after the applicant provides notification to the electrical corporation that the construction of a new accessory dwelling unit is complete.(7)Establish a process for an applicant for an accessory dwelling unit or a junior accessory dwelling unit to file a complaint with the commission for a violation of these requirements.(8)(4) Determine the penalties that shall be assessed on an electrical corporation for failing to comply with the timelines established by the commission pursuant to this section. (c) In establishing the timelines, the commission may consider a modification to shorten the timelines established pursuant to Section 934 for the sole purpose of expediting requests to energize an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit. 934.(d) In establishing timelines for energization of an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit, small energization projects, the commission shall require electrical corporations to comply with all of the following:(1) Allow an application for energization to be submitted with the electrical corporation at the same time an applicant applies for a building permit with the local permitting agency.(2) Not cancel an application for energization for an accessory dwelling unit or a junior accessory dwelling unit without the applicant’s consent. consent, unless the applicant fails to respond to the electrical corporation within a timeline established by the commission.(3) Provide the applicant and the electrical corporation the opportunity to extend the timeline if the applicant or electrical corporation requests a delay in completing the service connection. connection and the applicant and electrical corporation both agree.(4) Provide the applicant with an option to engage with electrical corporation staff for preapplication project review.(5) Provide the applicant with the electrical corporation’s upfront estimates of costs for the applicant’s planning purposes completed application that include estimates of all related fees, charges, and potential upgrades to electrical corporation infrastructure, including for increases in the amount of electricity to the property, that may be needed for energization.(6) An electrical corporation’s compliance with this section shall complement, and not conflict with, any rule, order, or determination by the commission pursuant to this article.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.